District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.62

Eligibility requirements.

An applicant for a license as an architect shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board of Architecture and Interior Designer that the applicant:

(1)

Is of good moral character;

(2)

Is a graduate of a degree program in architecture accredited by an accrediting institution prescribed by rule, or has completed an education program in architecture prescribed by rule as the equivalent of an accredited professional architectural degree program;

(3)

Has passed an examination on the practice of architecture prescribed by rule; and

(4)

Meets any other requirements established by rule to ensure that the applicant has had the proper training, experience, and qualifications to practice architecture.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.62.